Washington statutes.
RCW 11.44.070

Persons assisting in appraisement—Compensation—Refund.

The personal representative may employ a qualified and disinterested person to assist in ascertaining the fair market value as of the date of the decedent's death of any asset the value of which may be subject to reasonable doubt. Different persons may be employed to appraise different kinds of assets included in the estate. The amount of the fee to be paid to any persons assisting the personal representative in any appraisement shall be determined by the personal representative: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That the reasonableness of any such compensation shall, at the time of hearing on any final account as provided in chapter 11.76 RCW or on a request or petition under RCW 11.68.100 or 11.68.110, be reviewed by the court in accordance with the provisions of RCW 11.68.100, and if the court determines the compensation to be unreasonable, a personal representative may be ordered to make appropriate refund.

[ 1997 c 252 s 45; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 50; 1967 c 168 s 10; 1965 c 145 s 11.44.070. Formerly RCW 11.44.010, part.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.

Effective date—1965 c 145: See RCW 11.99.010.